Hawaii statutes.
§431:3-205 Funds required of new insurers.
Subject to section 431:3-203(a)(2), to qualify to transact any one class of
insurance, an insurer, not existing and authorized in this State on July 1,
1988, shall:

(1) Deposit in a federally insured financial
institution within the State, paid-up capital stock in the case of a stock
insurer, or unimpaired surplus if (A) a reciprocal insurer, or (B) a mutual
insurer which does not seek to qualify upon the basis of applications and
premiums collected as provided in sections 431:4-303 to 431:4-307, in an amount
not less than shown in the applicable Schedule "A";

(2) Maintain this deposit at all times while the
insurer is licensed and transacting insurance in this State; and

(3) Secure the approval of the commissioner before
making withdrawals from the depository.

Schedule
"A"

Class of Insurance Amount
Required

Life $ 600,000

Accident and Health or Sickness 450,000

Property 750,000

Marine and Transportation 1,000,000

Vehicle 1,000,000

General Casualty 1,500,000

Surety 1,000,000

Title 400,000

[L 1987, c 347, pt of §2 as superseded by c 348, §2;
am L 1989, c 195, §13; am L 2003, c 212, §20]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next